Tennessee, session 114, SB1172.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. This act is known and may be cited as the "African American Cultural and
Historical Grant Act."
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 11, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) There is created within the state general fund a special account to be known
as the African American cultural and historical grant fund. The purpose of the fund is to
support capital projects at facilities in this state that highlight the contributions,
culture, or history of African Americans.
(b) The Tennessee historical commission shall administer the fund.
(c) The fund is composed of money appropriated by the general assembly for
the fund, and gifts, grants, and other donations received by the commission for the fund.
(d) Subject to the availability of funds, the commission shall allocate and
disperse grants to entities and facilities to effectuate this section. The commission shall
establish and publish guidelines for applications, including eligibility, and the award of
grants. Priority for grants must be given to projects that encourage the design or
construction of a new facility in which no facility exists or the renovation of an existing
facility in an area with great cultural significance; enhance the beauty or aesthetic value
of facilities named for significant African Americans; or restore facilities on the national
register of historic places. Money in the fund may be used by the commission for
SB1172
002681
- 1 -

program administration, marketing expenses, and program evaluation; however, such
expenses must not exceed five percent (5%) of the total amount appropriated for the
program in any fiscal year.
(e) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund for the benefit of the fund
in accordance with § 9-4-603. Interest accruing on investments and deposits of the fund
must be credited to and remain part of the fund. Any unencumbered moneys and any
unexpended balance of the fund remaining at the end of a fiscal year do not revert to the
general fund, but must be carried forward until expended in accordance with this section.
(f) The commission shall submit an annual report to the finance, ways and
means committees of the senate and the committee of the house of representatives with
jurisdiction over finance by March 1, 2026, and by March 1 of each subsequent year on
the status of this program and the allocation of grant funds.
(g) The commission may promulgate rules necessary to effectuate this section.
The rules must be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative
Procedures Act, compiled in chapter 5 of this title.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 002681